Mississippi, session 2026, HB1740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) No inmate shall pay for any fees for healthcare services that are provided by the Department of Corrections' comprehensive correctional healthcare services provider.  From and after the effective date of this act, any such unpaid fees that have been previously assessed for an inmate for healthcare and have not been collected, shall be a charge-off for the comprehensive correctional healthcare services provider and the fees shall not be paid by the inmates. (2)  (a)  There shall be made available in each housing unit of state correctional facilities a communal kiosk or self-service terminal for state inmates.  The communal kiosk or terminal shall be made available to state inmates to request medical or dental appointments from the Department of Corrections' comprehensive correctional healthcare services provider. (b)  When a state inmate makes a request for a medical or dental appointment, pursuant to this subsection, the request shall become a part the inmate's electronic medical records.  The Department of Corrections' comprehensive correctional healthcare services provider shall, within twenty-four (24) hours of an inmate's electronic request being made, provide triage service for the inmate to assess his or her medical condition. (3)  (a)  If a state inmate is disabled or has difficulty walking, the Department of Corrections shall ensure that such inmate shall have his or her medication or medications, as the case may be, dispensed to the inmate as provided under this subsection. (b)  Every state inmate who is on any medication or medications, as the case may be, shall receive the medication or medications at the times prescribed for effective medication management for the inmate. (4)  The Department of Corrections shall employ one (1) licensed or registered dietician for all of its correctional facilities.  The licensed or registered dietician shall help ensure that the dietary restrictions of state inmates are followed.  The licensed or registered dietician shall be appropriately licensed to practice in the State of Mississippi as such. (5)  There shall be a nurse on staff twenty-four (24) hours a day at each state correctional facility and there shall be a physician on call for each facility.  The nurse shall have the ability to contact the physician to assess an inmate's medical condition and to determine the appropriate level of care needed. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.